Utah statutes.
72-6-204.   Minimum requirements for a tollway development agreement
proposal.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department and the commission shall make rules establishing minimum
guidelines for tollway development agreement proposals.
(2)  The guidelines under Subsection (1) shall require the proposal to
include:
(a)  a map indicating the location of the tollway facility;
(b)  a description of the tollway facility;
(c)  a list of the major permits and approvals required for developing or
operating improvements to the tollway facility from local, state, or federal
agencies and a projected schedule for obtaining the permits and approvals;
(d)  a description of the types of public utility facilities, if any, that
will be crossed by the tollway facility and a statement of the plans to
accommodate the crossing;
(e)  an estimate of the design and construction costs of the tollway facility;
(f)  a statement setting forth the private entity's general plans for
developing or operating the tollway facility, including identification of any
revenue, public or private, or proposed debt or equity investment proposed by
the private entity;
(g)  a statement of the estimated level of funding, if any, required to be
provided by the state;
(h)  the name and addresses of the persons who may be contacted for further
information concerning the tollway development agreement proposal; and
(i)  any other material or information that the department requires by rules
made under this section.
(3)  The department is not required to review a tollway development agreement
proposal if it determines that the proposal does not meet the guidelines
established under this section.
